Washington statutes.
RCW 2.14.070

Judicial retirement administrative account—Creation—Use—Excess balance—Deficiencies.

The judicial retirement administrative account is created in the state treasury. All expenses of the administrator for the courts under this chapter, including staffing and administrative expenses, shall be paid out of the administrative account. Any excess balance of this account over administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be transferred to the principal account. Any deficiency in the administrative account caused by an excess of administrative expenses disbursed from this account over the excess balance of this account shall be transferred to this account from the principal account.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 70; 1988 c 109 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.